Louisiana, session 2026, SB141.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 15:1228 and 1228.5(4) are hereby amended and reenacted to read as
follows:
§1228. Integrated Criminal Justice Information System Policy Board
The Integrated Criminal Justice Information System Policy Board, hereinafter
known as "policy board", is established under the jurisdiction of the Louisiana
Commission on Law Enforcement and Administration of Criminal Justice, office of
the governor Supreme Court.
* * *
§1228.5. Officers; meetings
The organization of the policy board shall be as follows:
* * *
(4) The Louisiana Commission on Law Enforcement and Administration of
Criminal Justice Supreme Court shall provide to the policy board such clerical,
professional, or technical staff as the policy board may require in the performance
of its duties. The policy board, with the concurrence of the chief executive officer of
the agency involved, may require additional personnel or technical assistance on a
temporary basis from any unit of the executive branch of state government.
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 141 ENROLLED
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.